Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1606
County extension society; annual report; budget.

The president and secretary of the organization shall on or before January 1 of each year file with the county clerk (1) a report of their work during the preceding year; (2) a sworn itemized statement of expenditures under sections 2-1601 to 2-1608 during the preceding year; and (3) a budget or estimate of the funds necessary for the carrying on of such work in the county during the ensuing year.

Laws 1939, c. 1, § 6, p. 56;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-2006;

R.S.1943, § 2-1606;

Laws 1992, LB 672, § 4.

The president and secretary of the county extension service submit proposed budget to county board. State ex rel. Agricultural Extension Service v. Miller, 182 Neb. 285, 154 N.W.2d 469 (1967).